Utah statutes.
26-49-201.   Regulation of services during emergency.

(1)  While an emergency declaration is in effect, the Department of Health or a local health department may limit, restrict, or otherwise regulate:

(a)  the duration of practice by volunteer health practitioners;

(b)  the geographical areas in which volunteer health practitioners may practice;

(c)  the types of volunteer health practitioners who may practice; and

(d)  any other matters necessary to coordinate effectively the provision of health or veterinary services during the emergency.

(2)  An order issued under Subsection (1) takes effect immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a rule within the meaning of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, or an adjudication within the meaning of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(3)  A host entity that uses volunteer health practitioners to provide health or veterinary services in Utah shall:

(a)  to the extent practicable and in order to provide for the efficient and effective use of volunteer health practitioners, consult and coordinate its activities with:

(i)  the Department of Health;

(ii)  local health departments; or

(iii)  the Utah Department of Agriculture and Food;

(b)  comply with all state and federal laws relating to the management of emergency health or veterinary services.

